Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1,114
Gift of personal property; approval by Governor; required, when.

Any gift of tangible or intangible personal property with a fair market value of more than ten thousand dollars, except money, shall be approved by the Governor prior to acceptance, except that such approval shall not be required for gifts of tangible or intangible personal property described in subsection (4) of section 81-1,113.

Laws 2024, LB998, § 6.
July 1, 2025